Utah statutes.
77-3a-102.   Fees -- Service of process.

(1)  Ex parte civil stalking injunctions and civil stalking injunctions shall be served by a sheriff or constable.

(2)  All service shall be in accordance with applicable law.

(3)  Fees may not be imposed by a court clerk, constable, or law enforcement agency for:

(a)  filing a petition under this chapter;

(b)  obtaining an ex parte civil stalking injunction; or

(c)  service of a civil stalking injunction, ex parte or otherwise.

